Nebraska, session 109, LB898.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 70-1014, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1014 (1) After hearing, the board shall have authority to approve
or deny the application. Except as provided in section 70-1014.01 for
special generation applications, before approval of an application, the
board shall find that:
(a) The application will serve the public convenience and necessity,
and that the applicant can most economically and feasibly supply the
electric service resulting from the proposed construction or acquisition
without unnecessary duplication of facilities or operations; and
(b)(i) For any proposed electric generation facility that has a
generating capacity that is greater than ten megawatts, the applicant has
held at least one public meeting with advanced publicized notice in one
of the counties in which the proposed facility will be located at which
(A) at least fifty percent of the governing body of the electric supplier
attends either in person or by videoconference, but with not less than
one member of the governing body physically present, (B) the applicant
explains the need for the proposed facility and the type of facility, and
(C) real property owners in any of the counties in which the proposed
facility will be located are provided an opportunity to comment on the
proposed facility. The applicant shall provide a report to the board
containing the minutes of any such meeting and how many people commented
on the proposed facility. Documentation received at any such meeting
shall be made available to the board upon its request. A meeting
described in this subdivision is not subject to the requirements
described in subdivision (2)(d) (2)(b)(iv) of section 84-1411.
(ii) This subdivision (b) shall not apply if the proposed facility
will be located on real property owned by the applicant at the time of
application.
(2) If the application involves a transmission line or related
facilities planned and approved by a regional transmission organization
-2-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
and the regional transmission organization has issued a notice to
construct or similar notice or order to a utility to construct the line
or related facilities, the board shall also consider information from the
regional transmission organization's planning process and may consider
the benefits to the region, which shall include Nebraska, provided by the
proposed line or related facilities as part of the board's process in
determining whether to approve or deny the application.
(3) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility is
exempt from this section if it complies with section 70-1014.02.
Sec. 2. Section 70-1014.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
70-1014.02 (1) The Legislature finds that:
(a) Nebraska has the authority as a sovereign state to protect its
land, natural resources, and cultural resources for economic and
aesthetic purposes for the benefit of its residents and future
generations by regulation of energy generation projects;
(b) The unique terrain and ecology of the Nebraska Sandhills provide
an irreplaceable habitat for millions of migratory birds and other
wildlife every year and serve as the home to numerous ranchers and
farmers;
(c) The grasslands of the Nebraska Sandhills and other natural
resources in Nebraska will become increasingly valuable, both
economically and strategically, as the demand for food and energy
increases; and
(d) The Nebraska Sandhills are home to priceless archaeological
sites of historical and cultural significance to American Indians.
(2)(a) A privately developed renewable energy generation facility
that meets the requirements of this section is exempt from sections
70-1012 to 70-1014.01 if, no less than thirty days prior to the
commencement of construction, the owner of the facility:
(i) Notifies the board in writing of its intent to commence
-3-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
construction of a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility;
(ii) Certifies to the board that the facility will meet the
requirements for a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility;
(iii) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier will
(A) comply with any decommissioning requirements adopted by the local
governmental entities having jurisdiction over the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility and (B) except as otherwise provided
in subdivision (c) of this subsection, submit a decommissioning plan to
the board obligating the private electric supplier to bear all costs of
decommissioning the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility and requiring that the private electric supplier post a security
bond or other instrument, no later than the sixth year following
commercial operation, securing the costs of decommissioning the facility
and provide a copy of the bond or instrument to the board;
(iv) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has
entered into or prior to commencing construction will enter into a joint
transmission development agreement pursuant to subdivision (d) of this
subsection with the electric supplier owning the transmission facilities
of sixty thousand volts or greater to which the privately developed
renewable energy generation facility will interconnect;
(v) Certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has
consulted with the Game and Parks Commission to identify potential
measures to avoid, minimize, and mitigate impacts to species identified
under subsection (1) or (2) of section 37-806 during the project planning
and design phases, if possible, but in no event later than the
commencement of construction; and
(vi) For a proposed privately developed renewable energy generation
facility that has a generating capacity that is greater than ten
megawatts, certifies to the board that the private electric supplier has
-4-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
held at least one public meeting with advanced publicized notice in one
of the counties in which the proposed facility will be located at which
(A) the private electric supplier explains the need for the proposed
facility and the type of facility and (B) real property owners in any of
the counties in which the proposed facility will be located are provided
an opportunity to comment on the proposed facility. The private electric
supplier shall provide a report to the board containing the minutes of
any such meeting and how many people commented on the proposed facility.
Documentation received at any such meeting shall be made available to the
board upon its request. A meeting described in this subdivision is not
subject to the requirements described in subdivision (2)(d) (2)(b)(iv) of
section 84-1411.
(b)(i) No less than thirty days prior to the commencement of
construction of a privately developed renewable energy generation
facility located within a ten-mile radius of a military installation, the
owner of such facility shall:
(A) Provide written notice to the board under subdivision (2)(b)(ii)
(A) of this section; or
(B) Certify in writing to the board that the facility will, upon
reaching commercial operation, be in compliance with the critical
infrastructure protection requirements issued by the North American
Electric Reliability Corporation if such facility is connected to the
transmission grid at one hundred kilovolts or higher voltage and has a
nameplate rating of twenty megavolt amperes for a single generation unit
or is injecting at an aggregate of seventy-five megavolt amperes or
greater. The owner of such facility shall also submit written notice to
the board at any time such facility is no longer in compliance with such
requirements.
(ii)(A) An owner of a facility choosing to proceed under subdivision
(2)(b)(i)(A) of this section shall, following consultation with such
owner's vendors, submit a one-time written notice to the board certifying
-5-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
that the facility continually contains no electronic-related equipment or
electronic-related components manufactured by any foreign adversary.
(B) The owner shall also submit written notice to the board at any
time such facility is no longer in compliance with the certification
provided under subdivision (2)(b)(ii)(A) of this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding subdivisions (2)(b)(i) and (ii) of this
section, the owner of a facility required to provide the certification
under subsection (2)(b)(i) may use electronic-related equipment or
electronic-related components manufactured by a foreign adversary if the
board preapproves the use of such equipment or components after finding
that:
(A) There is no other reasonable option for procuring such equipment
or components; and
(B) Not procuring or using such equipment or components would cause
a greater harm to the state than the harm associated with the equipment
or components.
(c) The board may bring an action in the name of the State of
Nebraska for failure to comply with subdivision (a)(iii)(B) of this
subsection, except that such subdivision does not apply if a local
government entity with the authority to create requirements for
decommissioning has enacted decommissioning requirements for the
applicable jurisdiction.
(d) A joint transmission development agreement shall be entered into
to address construction, ownership, operation, and maintenance of such
additions or upgrades to the transmission facilities as required for the
privately developed renewable energy generation facility. The joint
transmission development agreement shall be negotiated and executed
contemporaneously with the generator interconnection agreement or other
directives of the applicable regional transmission organization with
jurisdiction over the addition or upgrade of transmission, upon terms
consistent with prudent electric utility practices for the
-6-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
interconnection of renewable generation facilities, the electric
supplier's reasonable transmission interconnection requirements, and
applicable transmission design and construction standards. The electric
supplier shall have the right to purchase and own transmission facilities
as set forth in the joint transmission development agreement. The private
electric supplier of the privately developed renewable energy generation
facility shall have the right to construct any necessary facilities or
improvements set forth in the joint transmission development agreement
pursuant to the standards set forth in the agreement at the private
electric supplier's cost.
(3) Within ten days after receipt of a written notice complying with
subsection (2) of this section, the executive director of the board shall
issue a written acknowledgment that the privately developed renewable
energy generation facility is exempt from sections 70-1012 to 70-1014.01
if such facility remains in compliance with the requirements of this
section.
(4) The exemption allowed under this section for a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility shall extend to and exempt
all private electric suppliers owning any interest in the facility,
including any successor private electric supplier which subsequently
acquires any interest in the facility.
(5) No property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility shall be subject to
eminent domain by a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the
State of Nebraska. Nothing in this section shall be construed to grant
the power of eminent domain to a private electric supplier or limit the
rights of any entity to acquire any public, municipal, or utility right-
of-way across property owned, used, or operated as part of a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility as long as the right-of-
way does not prevent the operation of or access to the privately
developed renewable energy generation facility.
-7-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
(6) Only a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in the State
of Nebraska may exercise eminent domain authority to acquire the land
rights necessary for the construction of transmission lines and related
facilities. There is a rebuttable presumption that the exercise of
eminent domain to provide needed transmission lines and related
facilities for a privately developed renewable energy generation facility
is a public use.
(7) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a
private electric supplier to sell or deliver electricity at retail in
Nebraska.
(8) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the
authority of or require a consumer-owned electric supplier operating in
the State of Nebraska to enter into a joint agreement with a private
electric supplier to develop, construct, and jointly own a privately
developed renewable energy generation facility.
Sec. 3. Section 84-1411, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
84-1411 (1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (9) of this section,
each public body shall give reasonable advance publicized notice of the
time and place of each meeting as provided in this subsection. Such
notice shall be transmitted to all members of the public body and to the
public.
(b)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this section,
in the case of a public body described in subdivision (1)(a)(i) of
section 84-1409 or such body's advisory committees, such notice shall be
given by:
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the
public body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the
time and date of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website,
if available, and (III) posting on a statewide website, if available,
established and maintained as a repository for such notices by a majority
-8-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
of Nebraska newspapers. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and
on the websites by the newspaper; or
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II)
posting to a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if
no edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's
jurisdiction is to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the
websites by the newspaper.
(ii) In the case of the governing body of a city of the second class
or village, any advisory committee of such governing body, or the
governing body of a rural or suburban fire protection district, such
notice shall be given by:
(A)(I) Publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the
public body's jurisdiction that is finalized for printing prior to the
time and date of the meeting, (II) posting on such newspaper's website,
if available, and (III) posting on a statewide website, if available,
established and maintained as a repository for such notices by a majority
of Nebraska newspapers. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and
on the websites by the newspaper;
(B)(I) Posting to the newspaper's website, if available, and (II)
posting on a statewide website, if available, established and maintained
as a repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers if
no edition of a newspaper of general circulation within the public body's
jurisdiction is to be finalized for printing prior to the time and date
of the meeting. Such notice shall be placed in the newspaper and on the
websites by the newspaper; or
(C) Posting written notice in three conspicuous public places in
such city, village, or district. Such notice shall be posted by the
public body in the same three places for each meeting.
(iii) In the case of a public body not described in subdivision (1)
-9-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
(b)(i) or (ii) of this section, such notice shall be given by a method
designated by the public body.
(iv) In case of refusal, neglect, or inability of the newspaper to
publish the notice, the public body shall (A) post such notice on its
website, if available, (B) request the newspaper submit a post on a
statewide website, if available, established and maintained as a
repository for such notices by a majority of Nebraska newspapers, and (C)
post such notice in a conspicuous public place in such public body's
jurisdiction. The public body shall keep a written record of such posting
pursuant to subdivision (1)(b)(iv)(A) and (C) of this section and a
written record of the request to the newspaper pursuant to subdivision
(1)(b)(iv)(B) of this section. The record of such posting shall be
evidence that such posting was done as required and shall be sufficient
to fulfill the requirement of publication.
(c) In addition to a method of notice required by subdivision (1)(b)
(i) or (ii) of this section, such notice may also be provided by any
other appropriate method designated by such public body or such advisory
committee.
(d) Each public body shall record the methods and dates of such
notice in its minutes.
(e) Such notice shall contain an agenda of subjects known at the
time of the publicized notice or a statement that the agenda, which shall
be kept continually current, shall be readily available for public
inspection at the principal office of the public body during normal
business hours. Agenda items shall be sufficiently descriptive to give
the public reasonable notice of the matters to be considered at the
meeting. Except for items of an emergency nature, the agenda shall not be
altered later than (i) twenty-four hours before the scheduled
commencement of the meeting or (ii) forty-eight hours before the
scheduled commencement of a meeting of a city council or village board
scheduled outside the corporate limits of the municipality. The public
-10-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
body shall have the right to modify the agenda to include items of an
emergency nature only at such public meeting.
(2)(a) The following entities may hold a meeting by means of virtual
conferencing if the requirements of subdivision (2)(b) of this section
are met:
(i) A state agency, state board, state commission, state council, or
state committee, or an advisory committee of any such state entity;
(ii) An organization, including the governing body, created under
the Interlocal Cooperation Act, the Joint Public Agency Act, or the
Municipal Cooperative Financing Act;
(iii) The governing body of a public power district having a
chartered territory of more than one county in this state;
(iv) The governing body of a public power and irrigation district
having a chartered territory of more than one county in this state;
(v) An educational service unit;
(vi) The Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council;
(vii) An organization, including the governing body, of a risk
management pool or its advisory committees organized in accordance with
the Intergovernmental Risk Management Act;
(viii) A community college board of governors;
(ix) The Nebraska Brand Committee;
(x) A local public health department;
(xi) A metropolitan utilities district;
(xii) A regional metropolitan transit authority; and
(xiii) A natural resources district.
(2) A public body may hold (b) The requirements for holding a
meeting by means of virtual conferencing if the following requirements
are met are as follows:
(a) (i) Reasonable advance publicized notice is given as provided in
subsection (1) of this section, including providing access to a dial-in
number or link to the virtual conference;
-11-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
(b) (ii) In addition to the public's right to participate by virtual
conferencing, reasonable arrangements are made to accommodate the
public's right to attend at a physical site and participate as provided
in section 84-1412, including reasonable seating, in at least one
designated site in a building open to the public and identified in the
notice, with: At least one member of the public body entity holding such
meeting, or his or her designee, present at each site; a recording of the
hearing by audio or visual recording devices; and a reasonable
opportunity for input, such as public comment or questions, is provided
to at least the same extent as would be provided if virtual conferencing
was not used;
(c) (iii) At least one copy of all documents being considered at the
meeting is available at any physical site open to the public where
individuals may attend the virtual conference. The public body shall also
provide links to an electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being
considered at the meeting, and the current version of the Open Meetings
Act; and
(d) (iv) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision,
subsection (1) of section 70-1014, subsection (2) of section 70-1014.02,
or subsection (4) of section 79-2204, in the case of a public body whose
members are appointed or elected on a statewide basis, other than a
public body whose only functions are advisory or conducting studies, no
more than one-half of the meetings of the public body state entities,
advisory committees, boards, councils, organizations, or governing bodies
are held by virtual conferencing in a calendar year. In the case of (i)
(A) an organization created under the Interlocal Cooperation Act that
sells electricity or natural gas, (ii) (B) an organization created under
the Municipal Cooperative Financing Act, (iii) (C) a governing body of a
risk management pool, (iv) a public body whose only functions are
advisory or conducting studies, or (v) a public body whose members are
not appointed or elected on a statewide basis, such public body and any
-12-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
advisory committee of such governing body, or (D) any advisory committee
of any state entity created in response to the Opioid Prevention and
Treatment Act, such organization, governing body, or committee may hold
more than one-half of its meetings by virtual conferencing if such public
body organization holds at least one meeting each calendar year that is
not by virtual conferencing.
(3) Virtual conferencing, emails, faxes, or other electronic
communication shall not be used to circumvent any of the public
government purposes established in the Open Meetings Act.
(4) The secretary or other designee of each public body shall
maintain a list of the news media requesting notification of meetings and
shall make reasonable efforts to provide advance notification to them of
the time and place of each meeting and the subjects to be discussed at
that meeting.
(5) When it is necessary to hold an emergency meeting without
reasonable advance public notice, the nature of the emergency shall be
stated in the minutes and any formal action taken in such meeting shall
pertain only to the emergency. Such emergency meetings may be held by
virtual conferencing. The provisions of subsection (4) of this section
shall be complied with in conducting emergency meetings. Complete minutes
of such emergency meetings specifying the nature of the emergency and any
formal action taken at the meeting shall be made available to the public
by no later than the end of the next regular business day.
(6) A public body may allow a member of the public or any other
witness to appear before the public body by means of virtual
conferencing.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (5) of this section, if
an emergency is declared by the Governor pursuant to the Emergency
Management Act as defined in section 81-829.39, a public body the
territorial jurisdiction of which is included in the emergency
declaration, in whole or in part, may hold a meeting by virtual
-13-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
conferencing during such emergency if the public body gives reasonable
advance publicized notice as described in subsection (1) of this section.
The notice shall include information regarding access for the public and
news media. In addition to any formal action taken pertaining to the
emergency, the public body may hold such meeting for the purpose of
briefing, discussion of public business, formation of tentative policy,
or the taking of any action by the public body.
(b) The public body shall provide access by providing a dial-in
number or a link to the virtual conference. The public body shall also
provide links to an electronic copy of the agenda, all documents being
considered at the meeting, and the current version of the Open Meetings
Act. Reasonable arrangements shall be made to accommodate the public's
right to hear and speak at the meeting and record the meeting. Subsection
(4) of this section shall be complied with in conducting such meetings.
(c) The nature of the emergency shall be stated in the minutes.
Complete minutes of such meeting specifying the nature of the emergency
and any formal action taken at the meeting shall be made available for
inspection as provided in subsection (5) of section 84-1413.
(8) In addition to any other statutory authorization for virtual
conferencing, any public body not listed in subdivision (2)(a) of this
section may hold a meeting by virtual conferencing if:
(a) The purpose of the virtual meeting is to discuss items that are
scheduled to be discussed or acted upon at a subsequent non-virtual open
meeting of the public body;
(b) No action is taken by the public body at the virtual meeting;
and
(c) The public body complies with subdivisions (2)(a) (2)(b)(i) and
(b) (ii) of this section.
(9) This section does not apply to a meeting of the Nebraska Power
Review Board or a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an electric membership association, an electric cooperative
-14-

LB898 LB898
2026 2026
company, a municipality having a generation and distribution system, or a
registered group of municipalities if such meeting is subject to section
70-1034.
Sec. 4. Original sections 70-1014, 70-1014.02, and 84-1411, Revised
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-15-